Mississippi, session 2026, HB1254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Sections 1 through 13 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Math Act." SECTION 2. (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Early numeracy and fluency with whole-number operations, decimals and fractions are foundational to secondary mathematics; (b) Sustained, job-embedded mathematics coaching improves teacher practice and student outcomes; (c) Systematic screening and targeted interventions in the elementary grades reduce later remediation; and (d)  Ensuring Algebra readiness before middle school coursework strengthens the state's workforce pipeline. (2)  It is the intent of this act to establish a statewide framework, Moving Mathematics in Mississippi (M3) to: (a)  Expand mathematics coaching; (b) Implement kindergarten through Grade 5 mathematics screening with aligned interventions; (c) Establish an Algebra readiness indicator using the Grade 5 statewide mathematics assessment scale score; and (d)  Provide grade-band professional development aligned to Mississippi's College- and Career-Readiness Standards and assessments. SECTION 3. As used in Sections 1 through 13 of this act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section, unless context of use clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Board" means the State Board of Education. (b) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (c)  "M3" means the Moving Mathematics in Mississippi Program established in Sections 1 through 13 of this act. (d) "Coach" means a mathematics instructional coach employed or contracted by the department or a participating district, trained in the department's coaching model. (e) "High-Quality Instructional Materials (HQIM)" means standards-aligned, evidence-based mathematics curricula and assessments approved by the department. (f) "K5 Mathematics Screener" means a universal screening system for kindergarten through Grade 5 addressing grade-appropriate mathematics domains and skill progressions, as determined by the department. (g) "Algebra readiness indicator" means a scale score on the Grade 5 Statewide Mathematics Assessment established by the Department that suggests student readiness for Algebra I and is used to guide supports and placement. (h) "Individualized Math Plan (IMP)" means a written plan for a student identified by a screener as at-risk of not meeting grade-level expectations, specifying interventions, progress monitoring and exit criteria. (i) "MIOP" means the Mathematics Instructional Observation Protocol adopted by the department for classroom observation and administrator calibration. (j) "Professional learning community" means educational stakeholders who meet regularly to share expertise, analyze data, plan instruction, and collaborate to improve teaching capacity and student performance. SECTION 4. (1)  There is created within the State Department of Education the Moving Mathematics in Mississippi (M3) Program. (2)  The department, through the State Board of Education: (a)  Shall administer M3; (b)  May promulgate rules and regulations; (c)  May enter into contracts; and (d)  May partner with institutions of higher learning, school districts and nonprofit entities for implementation, evaluation and professional learning. (3)  The department may issue guidance for district participation, including model schedules, PLC structures, intervention blocks, and family engagement resources. SECTION 5. (1)  The program shall consist of the following components: (a)  The placement of mathematics coaches in schools serving students in kindergarten through Grade 12, with priority placement in Grades 2 through 6 to provide: (i)  On-site and virtual coaching cycles; (ii) Modeling; (iii) Professional Learning Communities facilitation; (iv) Data meetings; (v) Administrator walk-throughs using MIOP; and                 (vi)  Family math resources; (b) Implementation of kindergarten through Grade 5 screenings and intervention protocols, which require: (i) Adoption or development of a kindergarten through Grade 5 mathematics screener; (ii) Well-defined scores and skill maps; (iii) Development and implementation of Individualized Math Plans (IMPs) for students below benchmark; (iv) Training for teachers and administrators; and              (v)  Periodic progress monitoring; (c)  Use of the Grade 5 Statewide Mathematics Assessment scale score designated by the department as the Algebra Readiness Indicator, which provides for the development and implementation of IMPs for students below the indicator prior to middle school mathematics; and (d)  Ongoing regional training, virtual courses and school-based professional development cycles providing lesson guides, teacher-facing supports and assessment references aligned to HQIM and effective mathematics teaching practices. (2)  Coaching shall be organized by grade band to include elementary (K through Grade 6) and secondary (Grades 7 through 12) and may include college- and career-readiness coaches to align mathematics with workforce pathways and statewide assessments. (3)  The department may develop crosswalks and training to support intervention pathways based on students' Grade 5 results. SECTION 6. Coaching qualifications; deployment; fidelity. (1)  Coaches shall meet qualifications set by the department, including (a) demonstrated content knowledge; (b) training in the department's coaching model; and (c) experience facilitating adult learning. (2)  The department may employ coaches as state personnel, educators-in-residence, or through personal service or professional contracts, and may authorize participating districts to host coaches via agreements with the department. (3)  The department shall establish coach playbooks, dosage targets and fidelity expectations; may prioritize placements based on student need, vacancies and regional access; and shall provide administrator calibration using MIOP. SECTION 7. (1)  Beginning with the 20262027 school year, participating districts shall administer the kindergarten through Grade 5 Mathematics Screener at least three (3) times annually (e.g., beginning-, middle- and end-of-year cycles) on a schedule established by the department. (2)  For each student identified below benchmark, the school district shall develop an Individualized Math Plan (IMP) specifying evidence-based interventions, frequency and duration, the progress-monitoring schedule and exit criteria established by the department.  The IMP shall be shared with the student's parent or guardian within a timely manner and in parent-centered language both established by the department. (3)  The department shall provide model IMP templates, intervention menus and progress-monitoring tools, and may provide additional support for students with persistent risk. SECTION 8. (1)  Beginning with the 20262027 school year, the department shall designate and publish an Algebra Readiness Indicator scale score for the Grade 5 Statewide Mathematics Assessment pursuant to a standard-setting process approved by the State Board of Education. (2)  Districts shall use the Algebra Readiness Indicator to inform placement, acceleration and the development of Individualized Math Plans (IMPs) for students scoring below the indicator prior to entry into middle school mathematics. (3)  The Algebra Readiness Indicator shall be used as an indicator of readiness not criterion for student promotion or retention; local policies shall consider multiple measures consistent with Department guidance. (4)  The department shall recommend the indicator cut score, ensure alignment to content standards, and establish validity and reliability evidence.  The department shall review the indicator at least every three (3) years.  Exit criteria for students receiving interventions informed by the indicator shall be set by the department and may include sustained proficiency on subsequent mathematics assessments. SECTION 9. (1)  The department shall invite districts to participate and shall prioritize high-need districts based on achievement gaps, vacancies, rural access and other equity factors, while ensuring regional coverage. (2)  The department shall require a memorandum of understanding (MOU) specifying roles, data sharing consistent with federal and state law, coaching schedules and fidelity expectations, including the use of HQIM. SECTION 10. (1)  All student-level data collected under this act shall be maintained in compliance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA) and applicable state law. (2)  The department may develop a public dashboard with district-level results and implementation indicators. Student-level data shall not be publicly released. SECTION 11. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Moving Mathematics in Mississippi (M3) Fund".  The fund shall consist of money appropriated by the Legislature, grants, gifts and other monies as authorized by law. (2)  Monies in the fund shall be used by the department solely for the purposes administering the provisions of Sections 1 through 13 of this act, including, but not limited to: (a) Personnel or contracts for mathematics coaches; (b) Adoption, licensing or development of the K5 Mathematics Screener and technical work to set, report and maintain the Grade 5 Statewide Assessment Algebra Readiness Indicator and related data systems; (c) Professional development content and delivery; (d)  Regional trainings and travel; (e) Evaluation and reporting; and (f)  Program management and operations. SECTION 12. (1)  Of the funds appropriated in Section ___ of House Bill No. ____, 2026, Regular Session for Fiscal Year 2027, any unexpended balances as of June 30, 2027, not otherwise obligated, shall be reappropriated and authorized for expenditure in Fiscal Year 2028 for the same purposes.  Such funds shall not lapse into the State General Fund at the end of the fiscal year.   (2)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall be authorized to carry forward such funds in accordance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 13. (1)  The department may adopt emergency and permanent rules necessary to implement Sections 1 through 13 of this act, including establishing cut scores, benchmarking windows, intervention guidance and reporting templates. (2) The department shall publish an initial implementation timeline not later than beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, including recruitment and placement of coaches, screener procurement and training calendars, and establishment of the Grade 5 Statewide Mathematics Assessment Algebra Readiness Indicator scale score no later than December 1, 2026. SECTION 14.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.